District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

1-307.25

Applicability.

Expired.

History

Sept. 23, 1986, D.C. Law 6-155, § 5a
as added Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-196, § 2(a), 49 DCR 7640

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of § 1-307.25 and new codification of § 1-307.26, see § 2(a) of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-407, July 10, 2002, 49 DCR 7109).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 1-307.25 and new codification of § 1-307.26, see § 2(a) of Free Clinic Assistance Program Extension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-477, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9572).

Editor's Notes

Repeal of Part B: Section 16 of D.C. Law 17-196 provided: “The Free Clinic Assistance Program Act of 1986, effective September 23, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-155; D.C. Official Code § 1-307.21 et seq.), is repealed as of the date when the Agency becomes operational.”